fi: Katselualueen korkeus: Suuri; Keskimääräinen; Pieni; Muu
pt-BR: Altura da área de visualização: Grande; Médio; Pequena; Outro
nl: Hoogte weergavegebied: Groot; Medium; Klein; Andere
ja: 視界領域の高さ: 大; 媒体; 小; その他
hu: Látómező magassága: Nagy; Közepes; Kicsi; Egyéb
es: Altura del área de visualización: Grande; Medio; Pequeño; Otros
sv: Höjd på visningsområde: Stor; Medium; Liten; Övrigt
fr: Hauteur de la zone de visualisation: Grande; Moyen; Petite; Autre
cs: Výška zorného pole: Velká; Médium; Malá; Jiné
sk-SK: Výška zobrazovacej plochy: Veľký; Stredný; Malý; Iné
tr: Görüntüleme Alanı Yüksekliği: Büyük; Orta; Küçük; Diğer
da: Visningsområdehøjde: Stor; Medium; Lille; Andet
it: Altezza dell'area di visualizzazione: Large; Medio; Small; Altro
ko: 시야 창 높이: 라지; 매체; 스몰; 기타
zh-TW: 可視區域高度: 大; 媒介; 小; 其他
bg-BG: Височина на зрителната зона: Голяма; Средна; Малка; Други
de: Sichtfeldhöhe: Groß; Medium; Klein; Sonstiges
pl: Wysokość obszaru wyświetlania: Duży; Środek; Mała; Inne
lt-LT: Langelio aukštis: Didelis; Vidutinis; Mažas; Kita
pt-PT: Altura da área de visualização: Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Outro
hr-HR: Visina područja gledanja: Velika; Srednja; Mala; Ostalo
zh-CN: 可视区域高度: 大; 媒介; 小; 其他
el: Ύψος περιοχής θέασης: Μεγάλη; Μέση; Μικρός; Άλλο
sl-SI: Višina območja gledanja: Velika; Srednja; Majhna; Drugo
en: Viewing area height: Large; Medium; Small; Other
vi: Chiều cao khu vực xem: Lớn; Vừa; Nhỏ; Khác
nb: Høyde for visningsområde: Stor; Middels; Liten; Annet
ro-RO: Înălțimea zonei de vizualizare: Mare; Medie; Mică; Altele
ru: Высота просмотрового окна: Большой; Средний; Маленький; Другой
th: ความสูงของพื้นที่ชมวิว: ใหญ่; สื่อ; เล็ก; อื่นๆ